Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1209
Attorney; violations; penalty.

Any attorney who shall exchange any contracts of indemnity of the kind and character specified in section 44-1201, or any attorney, agent, or any person representing him, who shall solicit or negotiate any application for same without the attorney first complying with the foregoing provisions, shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1917, c. 189, § 9, p. 462;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XV, § 9, p. 685;

C.S.1922, § 7977;

C.S.1929, § 44-1509;

R.S.1943, § 44-1209;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 244.